src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s19_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - dylja: # 
    dylja+V+Inf: dylja
    dylja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: dylur
    dylja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: duldi
    dylja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: duldu
    dylja+V+Sup: dult
    dylja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: duldur
